District of Columbia statutes.
48-1211

Adjudication.

Civil violations of § 48-1201 shall be adjudicated by the Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with this subchapter.

July 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-126, § 201, 61 DCR 3482
Section 501 of D.C. Law 20-126 provided that the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.